Maryland, session 2026, HB1099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article III – Legislative Department
6.
(A) A member of the General Assembly shall be elected by the registered voters of
the legislative or delegate district from which [he] THE MEMBER seeks election, to serve
for a term of four years beginning on the second Wednesday of January following [his] THE
MEMBER’S election.
(B) (1) A PERSON WHO HAS SERVED FOUR TERMS IN THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY SHALL BE INELIGIBLE TO BE ELECTED TO SERVE A FURTHER TERM AS A
MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF THE LIMITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1099*

HOUSE BILL 1099
(I) NO TERM OF OFFICE THAT BEGAN PRIOR TO THE 2030
GUBERNATORIAL ELECTION MAY COUNT TOWARD THE TERM LIMITS ESTABLISHED
IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) A PERSON WHO SERVED TWO OR MORE YEARS OF A TERM AS
A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO WHICH ANOTHER PERSON WAS ELECTED
SHALL BE CONSIDERED TO HAVE SERVED A FULL TERM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.